lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/f.twolc
Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ä ö å '
%^A:ä %^O:ö %^U:y
p2:p t2:t k2:k
e2:e
%^WG:0
%>:0
;

Sets
Vow = a e o u i y ä ö å e2 ;
Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p r s t v w p2 t2 k2 ;
BackVow = a o u ;
FrontVow = ä ö y ;
NeutralVow = e i e2 ;
ArchiVow = %^A %^O %^U ;
Dummy = %^WG %> ;
Segment = Vow Cns ;
NonFront = BackVow ArchiVow NeutralVow Dummy Cns ;

Rules


! Consonant rules

! kvantitatiiviset
"Astevaihtelu pp"
p:0 <=> Vow p _ Vow %^WG: ;

"Astevaihtelu tt"
t:0 <=> Vow t _ Vow %^WG: ;

"Astevaihtelu k:0"
k:0 <=> Vow k _ Vow %^WG: ;
    [Vow - u] _ Vow %^WG: ;

"Astevaihtelu k:'"
k:' <=> Vow u _ Vow %^WG: ;
        
! kvalitatiiviset
"Astevaihtelu p"
p:v <=> Vow _ Vow %^WG: ;

"Astevaihtelu t"
t:d <=> Vow (h) _ Vow %^WG: ;

"Asteveihtelu k:v"
k:v <=> Cns u _ u %^WG: ;

"Asteveihtelu k:j"
k:j <=> Vow [r|l] _ e %^WG: ;

"Astevaihtelu sonorantti + t"
t:Cx <=> Vow Cx _ Vow %^WG: ;
	where Cx in ( l n r ) ;


! Vowel rules

"Sananloppuinen e:i"
e:i <=> _ [.#.|%>:] ;

"Vokaalisointu"
Vx:Vy <=> BackVow NonFront:* _ ;
	where Vx in ( %^A %^O %^U )
		  Vy in (   a   o   u )
		  matched ;
